Washington statutes.
RCW 12.12.080

Delivery of verdict.

When the jury have agreed on their verdict, they shall deliver the same to the justice, publicly, who shall enter it on his or her docket.

[ 2010 c 8 s 3025; Code 1881 s 1777; 1873 p 348 s 76; 1854 p 236 s 77; RRS s 1854.]